South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S462.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-36-2120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (85) capital equipment purchased by a school district, county, or municipality for use on a capital project.  For purposes of this item, "capital equipment" means an article of nonexpendable, tangible, personal property, to include communication software when purchased with a computer, having a useful life of more than one year, and an acquisition cost of fifty thousand dollars or more for each unit. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect July 1, 2025. ----XX----